Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2 Pharmacy Practice
63-10-217. Collaborative pharmacy practice agreements.

A collaborative pharmacy practice agreement under this chapter shall be between one (1) or more pharmacists licensed in this state and an individual prescriber licensed in this state, or one (1) or more prescribers licensed in this state in an organized medical group, including but not limited to, staff of a licensed health care facility, clinic, group medical practice, accountable care organization, or patient-centered medical home. When a collaborative practice pharmacy agreement is being established between a pharmacist or pharmacists and an organized medical group or one (1) or more members employed or contracted by an organized medical group, the chief medical officer, medical director, or a designated physician in that group shall be required to approve the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement in order to permit provision of patient care services, as defined in the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement.

The collaborative pharmacy practice agreement shall define the nature and scope of patient care services to be provided by the pharmacist. The prescriber or prescribers entering into the agreement retain the ultimate authority regarding the scope of services provided by pharmacists in accordance with a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. The patient care services authorized to be provided by one (1) or more pharmacists in accordance with a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement shall be within the scope of practice of the authorizing prescriber or prescribers. Any patient care services provided by a pharmacist or pharmacists pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement shall be documented in a patient record accessible by the pharmacist and the prescriber or communicated to the prescriber or prescribers within three (3) business days in accordance with the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement.

An individual prescriber licensed in this state or one (1) or more prescribers licensed in this state in an organized medical group, as described in the definition of collaborative pharmacy practice agreement in § 63-10-204, may employ pharmacists for the purpose of providing patient care services pursuant to a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement, as defined in § 63-10-204, for the benefit of a patient or patients of that prescriber or prescribers in that organized medical group. No retail pharmacy may employ a prescriber for the purpose of maintaining, establishing or entering into a collaborative practice agreement with a patient. Nothing shall prohibit a pharmacy or pharmacist or group of pharmacists from employing or entering into a professional contract with a physician or licensed medical practitioner for the purpose of conducting quality assurance reviews of its pharmacists that are engaged in the practice of collaborative drug therapy.

If the collaborative practice agreement includes one (1) or more prescribers who are advanced practice registered nurses (APRNs), the collaborating physician who has primary responsibility for collaborating with the APRN, must also approve and sign the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. The collaborating physician may only approve a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement of an APRN if the services authorized in the agreement are included in the routine services delivered by the collaborating physician in the physician's medical practice. An authorizing prescriber entering into collaborative pharmacy practice agreements shall be available for consultation with the pharmacist or pharmacists as needed.

If the collaborative practice agreement includes one (1) or more prescribers who are physician assistants (PAs), the supervising physician who has primary responsibility for supervising the PA, must also approve and sign the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. The supervising physician may only approve a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement of a PA if the services authorized in the agreement are included in the routine services delivered by the supervising physician in the physician's medical practice. An authorizing prescriber entering into collaborative pharmacy practice agreements shall be available for consultation with the pharmacist or pharmacists as needed.

Pharmacists and authorizing prescribers entering into collaborative pharmacy practice agreements shall maintain a copy of the written collaborative pharmacy practice agreement on file at their places of practice.

Collaborative pharmacy practice agreements shall be reviewed and renewed biennially, at a minimum.

The board of pharmacy, in collaboration with the board of medical examiners and board of osteopathic examination, shall promulgate rules establishing appropriate minimum standards applicable for provisions to be contained in any collaborative practice agreement, including, but not limited to, provisions regarding drugs or drug categories such as controlled substances covered under the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. All such rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2014, ch. 832, § 4; 2016, ch. 980, § 20; 2017, ch. 334, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act relative to the relationship between physicians and advanced practice registered nurses, please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 334.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment rewrote (d) which read: “If the collaborative practice agreement includes one (1) or more prescribers who are either advanced practice registered nurses (APRN) or physician assistants (PA), the supervising physician who has primary responsibility for supervising the APRN or PA, must also approve and sign the collaborative pharmacy practice agreement. The supervising physician may only approve a collaborative pharmacy practice agreement of an APRN or PA if the services authorized in the agreement are included in the routine services delivered by the supervising physician in the physician's medical practice. An authorizing prescriber entering into collaborative pharmacy practice agreements shall be available for consultation with the pharmacist or pharmacists as needed.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 334, § 15. July 1, 2017.

63-10-218. Professional judgment in dispensing of varying quantities of medication not to exceed ninety-day supply — Exclusion of controlled substances.

Unless the prescriber has specified on the prescription that dispensing a prescription for a maintenance medication in an initial amount followed by periodic refills is medically necessary, a pharmacist may exercise professional judgment to dispense varying quantities of medication per fill up to the total number of dosage units as authorized by the prescriber on the original prescription including any refills, so long as the units dispensed do not exceed a ninety-day supply.

This section does not apply to controlled substances or to any medications for which a report to the controlled substance database is required pursuant to § 53-10-305.

Acts 2016, ch. 656, § 1.

63-10-219. Provision of hormonal contraceptives.

As used in this section, “hormonal contraceptive” means a self-administered drug, or a transdermal patch applied to the skin of a patient, by the patient or by a practitioner, that releases a drug composed of a combination of hormones that are approved by the United States food and drug administration to prevent pregnancy.

Pursuant to this section, a pharmacist, in good faith, is authorized to provide hormonal contraceptives according to a valid collaborative pharmacy practice agreement containing a nonpatient-specific prescriptive order and standardized procedures developed and executed by one (1) or more authorized prescribers.

Pursuant to this section, a pharmacist may provide hormonal contraceptives to individuals who are:

Eighteen (18) years of age or older; or

Under eighteen (18) years of age, if the individual is an emancipated minor as defined in § 39-11-106.

The board of pharmacy, in collaboration with the board of medical examiners and the board of osteopathic examination, shall adopt rules to establish standard procedures for the provision of hormonal contraceptives by pharmacists. The standardized procedures adopted pursuant to this section shall require a pharmacist to:

Complete a training program approved by the department of health related to the provision of hormonal contraceptives;

Provide the patient with a self-screening risk assessment tool developed or approved by the department of health;

Provide the patient with documentation about the hormonal contraceptive that was provided to the patient and advise the patient to consult with a primary care practitioner or women's healthcare practitioner;

Provide the patient with a standardized factsheet that includes, but is not limited to, the indications and contraindications for use of the drug, the appropriate method for using the drug, the importance of medical follow-up, and other appropriate information;

Provide the patient with the contact information of a primary care practitioner or women's healthcare practitioner within a reasonable period of time after provision of the hormonal contraceptive; and

Either dispense the hormonal contraceptive, or refer the patient to a pharmacy that may dispense the hormonal contraceptive, as soon as practicable after the pharmacist determines that the patient should receive the medication.

The rules promulgated under this section shall prohibit a pharmacist from requiring a patient to schedule an appointment with the pharmacist for the provision or dispensing of a hormonal contraceptive.

A pharmacist, pharmacist's employer, or pharmacist's agent may charge an annual administrative fee for services provided pursuant to this section in addition to any costs associated with the dispensing of the drug and paid by the pharmacy benefit.

Upon an oral, telephonic, electronic, or written request from a patient or customer, a pharmacist or pharmacist's employee shall disclose the total cost that a consumer would pay for pharmacist-provided hormonal contraceptives. As used in this subdivision (f)(2), “total cost” includes providing the consumer with specific information regarding the price of the hormonal contraceptive and the price of the administrative fee charged. This limitation is not intended to interfere with other contractually agreed-upon terms between a pharmacist, a pharmacist's employer, or a pharmacist's agent, and a health insurance plan or insurer. Patients who are insured or covered and receive a pharmacy benefit that covers the cost of hormonal contraceptives shall not be required to pay an administrative fee. These patients shall be required to pay co-payments pursuant to the terms and conditions of their coverage.

All state and federal laws governing insurance coverage of contraceptive drugs, devices, products, and services shall apply to hormonal contraceptives provided by a pharmacist under this section.

The board of pharmacy, board of medical examiners, and board of osteopathic examination are authorized to ensure compliance with this section, and each board is specifically charged with the enforcement of this section with respect to its respective licensees.

Any pharmacist or prescriber acting in good faith and with reasonable care involved in the provision of hormonal contraceptives pursuant to this section shall be immune from disciplinary or adverse administrative actions under this title for acts or omissions during the provision of a hormonal contraceptive.

Any pharmacist or prescriber involved in the provision of hormonal contraceptives pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liability in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct for actions authorized by this section.

This section shall not apply to a valid patient-specific prescription for a hormonal contraceptive issued by an authorized prescriber and dispensed by a pharmacist pursuant to that valid prescription.

Acts 2016, ch. 942, § 1.

Compiler’s Notes. For preamble to act relative to the establishment of a method through which pharmacists may provide contraceptive therapies to patients, see Acts 2016, ch. 942.

63-10-220. Facilities engaging in distribution of dialysate and devices for home use.

This chapter does not apply to a facility to the extent the facility engages in the distribution of dialysate or devices necessary to perform home peritoneal kidney dialysis to patients with end stage renal disease if:

The dialysate are comprised of dextrose or icodextrin, and the dialysate and devices are approved or cleared by the federal food and drug administration, as required by federal law;

The dialysate and devices are lawfully held by a manufacturer or manufacturer's agent that is properly registered with the board as a manufacturer or third-party logistics provider;

The dialysate and devices are held and delivered in their original, sealed packaging from the facility;

The dialysate and devices are delivered only by the manufacturer or the manufacturer's agent and only upon receipt and review of a physician's prescription by a pharmacist licensed in this state before dispensing; and

The manufacturer or manufacturer's agent delivers the dialysate and devices directly to:

Patients with end stage renal disease or such patient's designee for the patient's self-administration of the dialysis therapy; or

Healthcare providers or institutions for administration or delivery of the dialysis therapy to a patient with end stage renal disease.

Records of all sales and distribution of dialysate and devices made pursuant to this section must be retained and made readily available for inspection and copying by the board of pharmacy for two (2) years from the date of distribution.

The board of pharmacy retains oversight of all drugs for peritoneal dialysis except dialysate.

Acts 2017, ch. 89, § 1.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 89, § 2. July 1, 2017.

63-10-221. Medication therapy management — Standards.

Medication therapy management provided under this chapter as part of the practice of pharmacy shall meet the standards for medication therapy management established by rule by the board of pharmacy.

Acts 2017, ch. 363, § 2.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 363, § 4. July 1, 2017.

63-10-222. Medication therapy management pilot program — Reporting of costs and patient outcomes.

The bureau of TennCare is directed to report to the senate health and welfare committee and the committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare regarding program costs and patient outcomes related to incorporating the pharmacist-provided medication therapy management pilot program on or before April 15 of each year the pilot program is supported.

Acts 2017, ch. 363, § 3; 2019, ch. 345, § 129.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “committee of the house of representatives having oversight over TennCare” for “health committee of the house of representatives”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 363, § 4. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

Medication therapy management pilot program, § 71-5-155.

63-10-223. Agreement limiting ability of pharmacist to discuss issue related to dispensing of controlled substance with patient void and unenforceable.

The general assembly finds that patient access to information about controlled substances is crucial to combating the deadly opioid epidemic in this state and that any obstacle to patients' receiving information about controlled substances is a serious threat to public health.

Any agreement purporting to limit the ability of a pharmacist to discuss any issue related to the dispensing of a controlled substance with a patient is contrary to the public policy of this state and is void and unenforceable. This includes, but is not limited to, information about the risks, effects, and characteristics of the controlled substance; what to expect when taking the controlled substance and how the controlled substance should be used; reasonable alternatives to the prescribed controlled substance; and any applicable cost sharing for a controlled substance or any amount an individual would pay for a controlled substance if that individual were paying cash.

Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 7.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1039, § 10. July 1, 2018; provided that for rulemaking purposes, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.